test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kubwl38_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - "kubõl, kupl": # Noun (38) "kubõl, kupl" 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kubõl+N+Sg+Nom: [kubõl, kupl]
     kubõl+N+Sg+Gen: kubla
     kubõl+N+Sg+Par: kupla
     kubõl+N+Sg+Ill: kupla
     kubõl+N+Pl+Gen: kuplõ
     kubõl+N+Pl+Par: kuplõ
     kubõl+N+Pl+Ill: [kuplõhe, kuplõ]
     kubõl+N+Pl+All: kublõlõ
